Nebraska, session 109, LB1224.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-319, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-319 (1) Any person who subjects another person to sexual
penetration (a) without the consent of the victim, (b) who knew or should
have known that the victim was mentally or physically incapable of
resisting or appraising the nature of his or her conduct, or (c) when the
actor is nineteen years of age or older and the victim is at least twelve
but less than sixteen years of age is guilty of sexual assault in the
first degree.
(2) Sexual assault in the first degree is a Class II felony. The
sentencing judge shall consider whether the actor caused serious personal
injury to the victim in reaching a decision on the sentence.
(3) Any person who is found guilty of sexual assault in the first
degree for a second time when the first conviction was pursuant to this
section or any other state or federal law with essentially the same
elements as this section shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term
of twenty-five years in prison.
(4) A person convicted of sexual assault in the first degree
pursuant to this section shall not monitor or provide instruction at a
school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation
or approval requirements.
Sec. 2. Section 28-319.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-319.01 (1) A person commits sexual assault of a child in the
first degree:
(a) When he or she subjects another person under twelve years of age
to sexual penetration and the actor is at least nineteen years of age or
older; or
(b) When he or she subjects another person who is at least twelve
years of age but less than sixteen years of age to sexual penetration and
the actor is twenty-five years of age or older.
-2-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
(2) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree is a Class IB
felony with a mandatory minimum sentence of fifteen years in prison for
the first offense.
(3) Any person who is found guilty of sexual assault of a child in
the first degree under this section and who has previously been convicted
(a) under this section, (b) under section 28-319 of first degree or
attempted first degree sexual assault, (c) under section 28-320.01 before
July 14, 2006, of sexual assault of a child or attempted sexual assault
of a child, (d) under section 28-320.01 on or after July 14, 2006, of
sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree or attempted
sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree, or (e) in any
other state or federal court under laws with essentially the same
elements as this section, section 28-319, or section 28-320.01 as it
existed before, on, or after July 14, 2006, shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony with a mandatory minimum sentence of twenty-five years in prison.
(4) In any prosecution under this section, the age of the actor
shall be an essential element of the offense that must be proved beyond a
reasonable doubt.
(5) A person convicted of sexual assault of a child pursuant to this
section shall not monitor or provide instruction at a school which elects
pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval
requirements.
Sec. 3. Section 28-320, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-320 (1) Any person who subjects another person to sexual contact
(a) without consent of the victim, or (b) who knew or should have known
that the victim was physically or mentally incapable of resisting or
appraising the nature of his or her conduct is guilty of sexual assault
in either the second degree or third degree.
(2) Sexual assault shall be in the second degree and is a Class IIA
felony if the actor shall have caused serious personal injury to the
-3-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
victim.
(3) Sexual assault shall be in the third degree and is a Class I
misdemeanor if the actor shall not have caused serious personal injury to
the victim.
(4) A person convicted of sexual assault in either the second degree
or third degree pursuant to this section shall not monitor or provide
instruction at a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to
meet accreditation or approval requirements.
Sec. 4. Section 28-320.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-320.01 (1) A person commits sexual assault of a child in the
second or third degree if he or she subjects another person fourteen
years of age or younger to sexual contact and the actor is at least
nineteen years of age or older.
(2) Sexual assault of a child is in the second degree if the actor
causes serious personal injury to the victim. Sexual assault of a child
in the second degree is a Class II felony for the first offense.
(3) Sexual assault of a child is in the third degree if the actor
does not cause serious personal injury to the victim. Sexual assault of a
child in the third degree is a Class IIIA felony for the first offense.
(4) Any person who is found guilty of second degree sexual assault
of a child under this section and who has previously been convicted (a)
under this section, (b) under section 28-319 of first degree or attempted
first degree sexual assault, (c) under section 28-319.01 for first degree
or attempted first degree sexual assault of a child, or (d) in any other
state or federal court under laws with essentially the same elements as
this section, section 28-319, or section 28-319.01 shall be guilty of a
Class IC felony and shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
twenty-five years in prison.
(5) Any person who is found guilty of third degree sexual assault of
a child under this section and who has previously been convicted (a)
-4-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
under this section, (b) under section 28-319 of first degree or attempted
first degree sexual assault, (c) under section 28-319.01 for first degree
or attempted first degree sexual assault of a child, or (d) in any other
state or federal court under laws with essentially the same elements as
this section, section 28-319, or section 28-319.01 shall be guilty of a
Class IC felony.
(6) A person convicted of sexual assault of a child in either the
second degree or third degree pursuant to this section shall not monitor
or provide instruction at a school which elects pursuant to section
79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements.
Sec. 5. Section 28-320.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-320.02 (1) No person shall knowingly solicit, coax, entice, or
lure (a) a child sixteen years of age or younger or (b) a peace officer
who is believed by such person to be a child sixteen years of age or
younger, by means of an electronic communication device as that term is
defined in section 28-833, to engage in an act which would be in
violation of section 28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320.01 or subsection (1) or
(2) of section 28-320. A person shall not be convicted of both a
violation of this subsection and a violation of section 28-319,
28-319.01, or 28-320.01 or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320 if the
violations arise out of the same set of facts or pattern of conduct and
the individual solicited, coaxed, enticed, or lured under this subsection
is also the victim of the sexual assault under section 28-319, 28-319.01,
or 28-320.01 or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a Class ID
felony. If a person who violates this section has previously been
convicted of a covered offense as defined in section 28-1802, the person
is guilty of a Class IC felony.
(3) A person convicted of either a Class ID felony or a Class IC
felony pursuant to this section shall not monitor or provide instruction
-5-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
at a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet
accreditation or approval requirements.
Sec. 6. Section 28-322.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-322.02 (1) Any person who subjects an inmate or parolee to sexual
penetration is guilty of sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the
first degree. Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree is
a Class IIA felony.
(2) A person convicted of sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in
the first degree pursuant to this section shall not monitor or provide
instruction at a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to
meet accreditation or approval requirements.
Sec. 7. Section 28-322.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-322.03 (1) Any person who subjects an inmate or parolee to sexual
contact is guilty of sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second
degree. Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree is a
Class IIIA felony.
(2) A person convicted of sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in
the second degree pursuant to this section shall not monitor or provide
instruction at a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to
meet accreditation or approval requirements.
Sec. 8. Section 28-322.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-322.04 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Person means an individual employed by the Department of Health
and Human Services and includes, but is not limited to, any individual
working in central administration or regional service areas or facilities
of the department and any individual to whom the department has
authorized or delegated control over a protected individual or a
protected individual's activities, whether by contract or otherwise; and
-6-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
(b) Protected individual means an individual in the care or custody
of the department.
(2) A person commits the offense of sexual abuse of a protected
individual if the person subjects a protected individual to sexual
penetration or sexual contact as those terms are defined in section
28-318. It is not a defense to a charge under this section that the
protected individual consented to such sexual penetration or sexual
contact.
(3) Any person who subjects a protected individual to sexual
penetration is guilty of sexual abuse of a protected individual in the
first degree. Sexual abuse of a protected individual in the first degree
is a Class IIA felony.
(4) Any person who subjects a protected individual to sexual contact
is guilty of sexual abuse of a protected individual in the second degree.
Sexual abuse of a protected individual in the second degree is a Class
IIIA felony.
(5) A person convicted of sexual abuse of a protected individual in
either the first degree or second degree pursuant to this section shall
not monitor or provide instruction at a school which elects pursuant to
section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements.
Sec. 9. Section 28-322.05, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-322.05 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Detainee means an individual who has been:
(i) Arrested by a person;
(ii) Detained by a person, regardless of whether the detainee has
been arrested or charged; or
(iii) Placed into the custody of a person, regardless of whether the
detainee has been arrested or charged;
(b) Law enforcement agency means an agency or department of this
state or of any political subdivision of this state which is responsible
-7-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
for the prevention and detection of crime; the enforcement of the penal,
traffic, or highway laws of this state or any political subdivision of
this state; and the enforcement of arrest warrants. Law enforcement
agency includes a police department, an office of the town marshal, an
office of the county sheriff, the Nebraska State Patrol, and any
department to which a deputy state sheriff is assigned as provided in
section 84-106; and
(c) Person means an individual:
(i) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency, including an
individual working under contract with the agency;
(ii) To whom the law enforcement agency has authorized or delegated
authority to make arrests, to place a detainee in detention or custody,
or to otherwise exercise control over a detainee or a detainee's
activities; and
(iii) Who is not the spouse of a detainee.
(2) A person commits the offense of sexual abuse of a detainee if
the person engages in sexual penetration or sexual contact with a
detainee. It is not a defense to a charge under this section that the
detainee consented to such sexual penetration or sexual contact.
(3) An otherwise lawful pat-down or body cavity search by a person
is not a violation of this section.
(4) Any person who engages in sexual penetration with a detainee is
guilty of sexual abuse of a detainee in the first degree. Sexual abuse of
a detainee in the first degree is a Class IIA felony.
(5) Any person who engages in sexual contact with a detainee is
guilty of sexual abuse of a detainee in the second degree. Sexual abuse
of a detainee in the second degree is a Class IIIA felony.
(6) A person convicted of sexual abuse of a detainee in either the
first degree or second degree pursuant to this section shall not monitor
or provide instruction at a school which elects pursuant to section
79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements.
-8-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
Sec. 10. Section 28-323, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-323 (1) A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the
third degree if he or she:
(a) Intentionally and knowingly causes bodily injury to his or her
intimate partner;
(b) Threatens an intimate partner with imminent bodily injury; or
(c) Threatens an intimate partner in a menacing manner.
(2) A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the second
degree if he or she intentionally and knowingly causes bodily injury to
his or her intimate partner with a dangerous instrument.
(3) A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the first
degree if he or she intentionally and knowingly causes serious bodily
injury to his or her intimate partner.
(4) Violation of subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section is a
Class I misdemeanor, except that for any subsequent violation of
subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section, any person so offending is
guilty of a Class IIIA felony.
(5) Violation of subdivision (1)(c) of this section is a Class I
misdemeanor.
(6) Violation of subsection (2) of this section is a Class IIIA
felony, except that for any second or subsequent violation of such
subsection, any person so offending is guilty of a Class IIA felony.
(7) Violation of subsection (3) of this section is a Class IIA
felony, except that for any second or subsequent violation under such
subsection, any person so offending is guilty of a Class II felony.
(8) For purposes of this section, intimate partner means a spouse; a
former spouse; persons who have a child in common whether or not they
have been married or lived together at any time; and persons who are or
were involved in a dating relationship. For purposes of this subsection,
dating relationship means frequent, intimate associations primarily
-9-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
characterized by the expectation of affectional or sexual involvement,
but does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary association
between persons in a business or social context.
(9) A person convicted of domestic assault pursuant to this section
shall not monitor or provide instruction at a school which elects
pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval
requirements.
Sec. 11. Section 28-707, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-707 (1) A person commits child abuse if he or she knowingly,
intentionally, or negligently causes or permits a minor child to be:
(a) Placed in a situation that endangers his or her life or physical
or mental health;
(b) Cruelly confined or cruelly punished;
(c) Deprived of necessary food, clothing, shelter, or care;
(d) Placed in a situation to be sexually exploited through sex
trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830 or by allowing,
encouraging, or forcing such minor child to engage in debauchery, public
indecency, or obscene or pornographic photography, films, or depictions;
(e) Placed in a situation to be sexually abused as defined in
section 28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320.01; or
(f) Placed in a situation to be a trafficking victim as defined in
section 28-830.
(2) The statutory privilege between patient and physician, between
client and professional counselor, and between husband and wife shall not
be available for excluding or refusing testimony in any prosecution for a
violation of this section.
(3) Child abuse is a Class I misdemeanor if the offense is committed
negligently and does not result in serious bodily injury as defined in
section 28-109 or death.
(4) Child abuse is a Class IIIA felony if the offense is committed
-10-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
knowingly and intentionally and does not result in serious bodily injury
as defined in section 28-109 or death.
(5) Child abuse is a Class IIIA felony if the offense is committed
negligently and results in serious bodily injury as defined in section
28-109.
(6) Child abuse is a Class IIA felony if the offense is committed
negligently and results in the death of such child.
(7) Child abuse is a Class II felony if the offense is committed
knowingly and intentionally and results in serious bodily injury as
defined in such section.
(8) Child abuse is a Class IB felony if the offense is committed
knowingly and intentionally and results in the death of such child.
(9) For purposes of this section, negligently refers to criminal
negligence and means that a person knew or should have known of the
danger involved and acted recklessly, as defined in section 28-109, with
respect to the safety or health of the minor child.
(10) A person convicted of child abuse pursuant to this section
shall not monitor or provide instruction at a school which elects
pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval
requirements.
Sec. 12. Section 28-710, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-710 (1) Sections 28-710 to 28-727 and section 13 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Child Protection and Family Safety
Act.
(2) For purposes of the Child Protection and Family Safety Act:
(a) Alternative response means a comprehensive assessment of (i)
child safety, (ii) the risk of future child abuse or neglect, (iii)
family strengths and needs, and (iv) the provision of or referral for
necessary services and support. Alternative response is an alternative to
traditional response and does not include an investigation or a formal
-11-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
determination as to whether child abuse or neglect has occurred, and the
subject of the report shall not be entered into the central registry of
child protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718;
(b) Child abuse or neglect means knowingly, intentionally, or
negligently causing or permitting a minor child to be:
(i) Placed in a situation that endangers his or her life or physical
or mental health;
(ii) Cruelly confined or cruelly punished;
(iii) Deprived of necessary food, clothing, shelter, or care;
(iv) Left unattended in a motor vehicle if such minor child is six
years of age or younger;
(v) Placed in a situation to be sexually abused;
(vi) Placed in a situation to be sexually exploited through sex
trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830 or by allowing,
encouraging, or forcing such person to engage in debauchery, public
indecency, or obscene or pornographic photography, films, or depictions;
or
(vii) Placed in a situation to be a trafficking victim as defined in
section 28-830;
(c) Child advocacy center means a community-based organization that
(i) provides an appropriate site for conducting forensic interviews as
defined in section 28-728 and referring victims of child abuse or neglect
and appropriate caregivers for such victims to needed evaluation,
services, and supports, (ii) assists county attorneys in facilitating
case reviews, developing and updating protocols, and arranging training
opportunities for the teams established pursuant to sections 28-728 and
28-729, and (iii) is a member, in good standing, of a state chapter as
defined in 34 U.S.C. 20302;
(d) Comprehensive assessment means an analysis of child safety, risk
of future child abuse or neglect, and family strengths and needs on a
report of child abuse or neglect using an evidence-informed and validated
-12-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
tool. Comprehensive assessment does not include a finding as to whether
the child abuse or neglect occurred but does determine the need for
services and support, if any, to address the safety of children and the
risk of future abuse or neglect;
(e) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(f) Educational decisionmaker has the same meaning as in section
79-530;
(g) Exempt school means a school which elects pursuant to section
79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements;
(h) (f) Investigation means fact gathering by the department, using
an evidence-informed and validated tool, or by law enforcement related to
the current safety of a child and the risk of future child abuse or
neglect that determines whether child abuse or neglect has occurred and
whether child protective services are needed;
(i) (g) Kin caregiver means a person with whom a child in foster
care has been placed or with whom a child is residing pursuant to a
temporary living arrangement in a non-court-involved case, who has
previously lived with or is a trusted adult that has a preexisting,
significant relationship with the child or with a sibling of such child
placed pursuant to section 43-1311.02;
(j) (h) Law enforcement agency means the police department or town
marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of the sheriff in
unincorporated areas, and the Nebraska State Patrol;
(k) (i) Member of a military family means an individual who is:
(i) Serving active duty service in the armed forces of the United
States, including any reserve component or the National Guard; or
(ii) Is a dependent, as defined in 50 U.S.C. 3911, of a person
described in subdivision (2)(j)(i) (2)(i)(i) of this section;
(l) (j) Non-court-involved case means an ongoing case opened by the
department following a report of child abuse or neglect in which the
department has determined that ongoing services are required to maintain
-13-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
the safety of a child or alleviate the risk of future abuse or neglect
and in which the family voluntarily engages in child protective services
without a filing in a juvenile court;
(m) (k) Out-of-home child abuse or neglect means child abuse or
neglect occurring outside of a child's family home, including in day care
homes, foster homes, day care centers, residential child-caring agencies
as defined in section 71-1926, other child care facilities or
institutions, and the community. Out-of-home child abuse or neglect also
includes cases in which the subject of the report of child abuse or
neglect is not a member of the child's household, no longer has access to
the child, is unknown, or cannot be identified;
(n) (l) Relative caregiver means a person with whom a child is
placed by the department and who is related to the child, or to a sibling
of such child pursuant to section 43-1311.02, by blood, marriage, or
adoption or, in the case of an Indian child, is an extended family member
as defined in section 43-1503;
(o) (m) Report means any communication received by the department or
a law enforcement agency pursuant to the Child Protection and Family
Safety Act that describes child abuse or neglect and contains sufficient
content to identify the child who is the alleged victim of child abuse or
neglect;
(p) (n) Review, Evaluate, and Decide Team means an internal team of
staff within the department and shall include no fewer than two
supervisors or administrators and two staff members knowledgeable on the
policies and practices of the department, including, but not limited to,
the structured review process. County attorneys, child advocacy centers,
or law enforcement agency personnel may attend team reviews upon request
of a party;
(q) (o) School employee means a person nineteen years of age or
older who is employed by a public, private, denominational, or parochial
school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education;
-14-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
(r) (p) Student means a person less than nineteen years of age
enrolled in or attending a public, private, denominational, or parochial
school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education, or
who was such a person enrolled in or who attended such a school within
ninety days of any violation of section 28-316.01;
(s) (q) Traditional response means an investigation by a law
enforcement agency or the department pursuant to section 28-713 which
requires a formal determination of whether child abuse or neglect has
occurred; and
(t) (r) Subject of the report of child abuse or neglect or subject
of the report means the person or persons identified in the report as
responsible for the child abuse or neglect.
Sec. 13. (1) The subject of a report of child abuse or neglect
shall not be permitted to transfer a student for whom such subject is a
parent, legal guardian, or educational decisionmaker from the student's
current school to an exempt school during a review of such report by a
Review, Evaluate, and Decide Team pursuant to 28-712.01 or during a
traditional response.
(2) For any report involving a subject who is a parent of a student,
legal guardian of a student, or educational decisionmaker for a student,
the department shall notify each such student's current school and the
Commissioner of Education that an election filed under section 79-1601
allowing such student to transfer to an exempt school shall be invalid
until further notice.
(3) If an election is filed under section 79-1601 in violation of
this section or if such student's current school receives a request to
transfer or disenroll such student, the commissioner or the school shall
immediately notify the local law enforcement agency of the filing or the
request and that such filing or request may be related to the subject of
a report of child abuse or neglect that is currently being investigated.
(4) When a determination is made by the Review, Evaluate, and Decide
-15-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
Team to assign the report for alternative response or when formal
determination of whether child abuse or neglect has occurred with regard
to such report, the department shall notify such student's current school
and the Commissioner of Education that there is no longer a restriction
under subsection (2) of this section on allowing such student to transfer
to an exempt school.
(5) Notices pursuant to this section are confidential investigation
records and shall not contain any information other than the name of the
student and whether or not to allow such student to transfer to an exempt
school pursuant to this section.
(6) The department shall establish procedures to carry out this
section.
Sec. 14. Section 28-713.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-713.03 (1) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations consistent with Laws 2020, LB1061, and shall revoke any rules
and regulations inconsistent with Laws 2020, LB1061, by July 1, 2021.
(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
regarding (a) the maximum time allowed between receiving a report of
child abuse or neglect and an assigned caseworker making contact with the
affected family, (b) the maximum amount of time between receipt of a
report and the completion of an assessment or investigation, (c) the
transfer of cases from alternative response to traditional response, (d)
the criteria and process to be used by the Review, Evaluate, and Decide
Team, and (e) the process used to accept and categorize reports,
including the operation of the hotline established under section 28-711.
(3) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
describing the process for non-court-involved cases, the right of any
child, parent, kin caregiver, or relative caregiver to an administrative
appeal of any department action or inaction in a non-court-involved case,
and the process for finding that a child is seriously endangered.
-16-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
(4) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the provisions of section 13 of this act.
Sec. 15. Section 79-1601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1601 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (6) of
this section, all private, denominational, and parochial schools in the
State of Nebraska and all teachers employed or giving instruction in such
schools shall be subject to and governed by the provisions of the general
school laws of the state so far as the same apply to grades,
qualifications, and certification of teachers and promotion of students.
All private, denominational, and parochial schools shall have adequate
equipment and supplies, shall be graded the same, and shall have courses
of study for each grade conducted in such schools substantially the same
as those given in the public schools which the students would attend in
the absence of such private, denominational, or parochial schools.
(2) All private, denominational, or parochial schools shall either
comply with the accreditation or approval requirements as prescribed
pursuant to section 79-318 or, for those schools which elect not to meet
accreditation or approval requirements, the requirements prescribed in
subsections (2) through (6) of this section. Standards and procedures for
approval and accreditation shall be based upon the program of studies,
guidance services, the number and preparation of teachers in relation to
the curriculum and enrollment, instructional materials and equipment,
science facilities and equipment, library facilities and materials, and
health and safety factors in buildings and grounds. Rules and regulations
governing procedures for private, denominational, and parochial schools
which elect, pursuant to the procedures prescribed in subsections (2)
through (6) of this section, not to meet state accreditation or approval
requirements shall be based upon an assurance that such schools offer a
program of instruction leading to the acquisition of basic skills in the
language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, and health. The
-17-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
assurance required pursuant to this subsection shall be satisfied by a
signed statement by the parent, legal guardian, or educational
decisionmaker of a student that the education provided complies with
subsections (2) through (6) of this section. Rules and regulations which
govern procedures under this section are limited to procedures for
receiving information from a parent, legal guardian, or educational
decisionmaker of a student or a parent representative when such
individual files the election not to meet accreditation or approval
requirements under this section and procedures for carrying out section
13 of this act.
(3) The provisions of subsections (3) through (6) of this section
shall apply to any private, denominational, or parochial school in the
State of Nebraska which elects not to meet state accreditation or
approval requirements. Except as provided in section 13 of this act, an
An election pursuant to such subsections shall be effective when a
statement is received by the Commissioner of Education signed by a
parent, legal guardian, or educational decisionmaker of each student
attending such private, denominational, or parochial school, stating that
(a) either specifically (i) the requirements for approval and
accreditation required by law and the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the State Board of Education violate sincerely held
religious beliefs of the parent, legal guardian, or educational
decisionmaker or (ii) the requirements for approval and accreditation
required by law and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by
the State Board of Education interfere with the decisions of the parent,
legal guardian, or educational decisionmaker in directing the student's
education, (b) an authorized representative of such parent, legal
guardian, or educational decisionmaker will annually submit to the
Commissioner of Education an assurance that the requirements of
subdivisions (4)(a) through (c) of this section are and will continue to
be satisfied, (c) the school offers the courses of instruction required
-18-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
by subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, and (d) the parent,
legal guardian, or educational decisionmaker is satisfied that
individuals monitoring instruction at such school are qualified to
monitor instruction in the basic skills as required by subsections (2),
(3), and (4), and (5) of this section.
(4) Each such private, denominational, or parochial school shall (a)
meet minimum requirements relating to health, fire, and safety standards
prescribed by state law and the rules and regulations of the State Fire
Marshal, (b) report attendance pursuant to section 79-201, (c) maintain a
sequential program of instruction designed to lead to basic skills in the
language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, and health, and (d)
comply with the immunization requirements in section 79-217 if the
statement signed by the parent, legal guardian, or educational
decisionmaker indicates a nonreligious reason pursuant to subdivision (3)
(a)(ii) of this section for the student attending a private,
denominational, or parochial school which elects not to meet state
accreditation or approval requirements. The State Board of Education
shall establish procedures for receiving information and reports required
by subsections (3) through (6) of this section from authorized parent
representatives who may act as agents for the parent, legal guardian, or
educational decisionmaker of a student attending such schools.
(5)(a) (5) Individuals employed or utilized by schools which elect
not to meet state accreditation or approval requirements shall not be
required to meet the certification requirements prescribed in sections
79-801 to 79-815.
(b) Individuals monitoring or providing instruction at a school
which elects not to meet state accreditation or approval requirements
shall not have been convicted of any offense under section 28-319 to
28-322.05, 28-323, or 28-707.
(6) Any school which elects not to meet state accreditation or
approval requirements and does not meet the requirements of subsections
-19-

LB1224 LB1224
2026 2026
(2) through (6) of this section shall not be deemed a school, and the
parent, legal guardian, or educational decisionmaker of any students
attending such school shall be subject to prosecution pursuant to section
79-201 or any statutes relating to habitual truancy.
(7) For purposes of this section, educational decisionmaker means a
person designated or ordered by a court to make educational decisions on
behalf of a child.
Sec. 16. Original sections 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320, 28-320.01,
28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04, 28-323, and 79-1601, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, sections 28-322.05, 28-707, and 28-713.03, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 28-320.02 and 28-710,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-20-